Louisiana, session 2026, HB372.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:402.1(G) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§402.1. Driver education; required
* * *
G. The office of motor vehicles shall develop a public education and
outreach campaign to promote safety and educate the public on the use of
roundabouts via written materials, brochures, the Internet, and public service
announcements made available to the public.